Utah statutes.
31A-27a-120.   Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application of this chapter to any person or circumstance is for any reason held invalid, the remainder of the chapter and the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances shall be given effect without the invalid provision or application.  The provisions of this chapter are severable.

